Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.060

Power of successor trustee.

A successor trustee of a trust shall succeed to all the powers, duties and discretionary authority of the original trustee.

[ 1985 c 30 s 48. Prior: 1959 c 124 s 6. Formerly RCW 30.99.060.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.